fr: Type d'appât compatible: Bouillettes; Pain; Grains de maïs; Dumbells; Amorce; Graines; Pâte; Granulés; Leurre souple; Noix tigrées; Autre
bg-BG: Съвместим тип стръв: Протеинови топчета (Boilies); Хляб; Царевични зърна; Дъмбели; Захранка; Зърнени култури (particles); Паста; Пелети; Силиконова примамка; Тигров фъстък; Друго
zh-CN: 适用饵料类型: 面团饵; 面包; 玉米粒; 哑铃型诱饵; 窝料; 颗粒诱饵; 糊状饵; 颗粒饵; 软塑料假饵; 虎坚果; 其他
en: Compatible bait type: Boilies; Bread; Corn kernels; Dumbbells; Groundbait; Particles; Paste; Pellets; Soft plastic bait; Tiger nuts; Other
hu: Kompatibilis csalitípus: Bojli; Kenyér; Kukoricaszemek; Dumbbell; Etetőanyag; Magvak; Paszták; Pellet; Lágy plasztik csali; Tigrismogyoró; Egyéb
nl: Compatibel aastype: Boilies; Brood; Maïskorrels; Dumbbells; Lokvoer; Partikels; Deeg; Pellets; Zacht plastic aas; Tijgernoten; Overige
pl: Zgodny rodzaj przynęty: Kulki proteinowe; Chleb; Ziarna kukurydzy; Dumbellsy; Zanęta; Ziarna wędkarskie; Pasta; Pellet; Przynęta miękka; Orzechy tygrysie; Inny
cs: Kompatibilní typ návnady: Boilies; Chléb; Kukuřičná zrna; Dumbells; Krmítková směs; Partikl; Těsto; Pelety; Gumová nástraha; Tygří ořech; Ostatní
es: Tipo de cebo compatible: Boilies; Pan; Granos de maíz; Dumbbells; Engodo; Partículas; Pasta; Pellets; Cebo de plástico blando; Chufas; Otro
de: Kompatible Köderart: Boilies; Brot; Maiskörner; Dumbbells; Grundfutter; Partikel; Teig; Pellets; Gummiköder; Tigernüsse; Sonstige
lt-LT: Suderinamo tipo masalas: Baltyminiai kukuliai (boiliai); Duona; Kukurūzų grūdai; Dumbelio formos boiliai; Jaukas; Jauko dalelės (grūdai, sėklos); Tešla; Peletės; Minkštas plastikinis masalas; Tigriniai riešutai; Kita
vi: Loại mồi câu tương thích: Mồi viên; Bánh mì; Hạt ngô; Mồi dạng tạ đôi; Mồi xả; Mồi hạt; Mồi bột nhào; Mồi cám viên; Mồi nhựa mềm; Hạt củ gấu; Khác
tr: Uyumlu yem türü: Boili; Ekmek; Mısır taneleri; Dambıl; Zemin yemi; Parçacıklı yem; Hamur; Pelet; Silikon yem; Yer bademi; Diğer
sk-SK: Typ kompatibilnej návnady: Boilies; Chlieb; Kukuričné zrná; Dumbells; Krmivo; Partikel; Cesto; Pelety; Gumené nástrahy; Tigrí orech; Iné
el: Συμβατός τύπος δολώματος: Boilies; Ψωμί; Σπόροι καλαμποκιού; Dumbbells; Μαλάγρα; Σωματίδια; Πάστα; Pellets; Μαλακό πλαστικό δόλωμα; Tiger nuts; Άλλο
sv: Kompatibel betestyp: Boilies; Bröd; Majskorn; Dumbbells; Mäsk; Partikelbeten; Pasta; Pellets; Mjukbete i plast; Tigernötter; Övrigt
zh-TW: 相容魚餌類型: 沸水餌; 麵包; 玉米粒; 啞鈴餌; 誘餌粉; 顆粒餌; 膏狀餌; 粒狀餌; 軟塑膠假餌; 虎堅果; 其他
nb: Kompatibel agntype: Boilies; Brød; Maiskorn; Dumbbells; Fôr / grunnfôr; Partikler; Deig; Pellets; Mykplastagn / jigg; Tigernøtter; Annet
ja: 対応ベイトタイプ: ボイリー; パン; コーンカーネル; ダンベル; グラウンドベイト; パーティクル; ペースト; ペレット; ソフトプラスチックベイト; タイガーナッツ; その他
hr-HR: Kompatibilna vrsta mamca: Boile; Kruh; Zrna kukuruza; Dumbbell mamci; Primama; Partikl; Pasta; Peleti; Mekani silikonski mamac; Tigrov orah; Ostalo
sl-SI: Združljiva vrsta vabe: Bojliji; Kruh; Koruzna zrna; Dumbbell vabe; Talna vaba; Partikli; Pasta; Peleti; Vaba iz mehke plastike; Tigrovi oreščki; Drugo
ru: Совместимый тип приманки: Бойлы; Хлеб; Зерна кукурузы; Дамбелсы; Прикормка; Зерновые смеси; Паста; Пеллетс; Силиконовые приманки; Тигровые орехи; Другое
ro-RO: Tip de momeală compatibilă: Boilies; Pâine; Boabe de porumb; Dumbbells; Nadă; Semințe (particule); Pastă; Pelete; Momeală din plastic moale; Alune tigrate; Altele
fi: Yhteensopiva syöttityyppi: Boiliet; Leipä; Maissinjyvät; Dumbbell-syötit; Mäski; Partikkelit; Tahna; Pelletit; Pehmeä muovisyötti; Tiikeripähkinät; Muu
it: Tipo di esca compatibile: Boilie; Pane; Chicchi di mais; Dumbbell; Pastura; Granaglie; Pasta; Pellet; Esca in gomma; Tiger nut; Altro
th: ประเภทเหยื่อที่ใช้งานร่วมกันได้: บอยลี; ขนมปัง; เมล็ดข้าวโพด; เหยื่อดัมเบล; เหยื่ออ่อย; เหยื่ออนุภาค; เหยื่อแป้ง; เหยื่อเม็ด; เหยื่อยาง; ไทเกอร์นัท; อื่นๆ
pt-PT: Tipo de isco compatível: Boilies; Pão; Grãos de milho; Dumbbells; Engodo; Partículas; Massa; Pellets; Isco de plástico macio; Chufas; Outro
da: Kompatibel lokkemadstype: Boilies; Brød; Majskorn; Dumbbells; Forfoder; Partikler; Pasta; Pellets; Softbait; Tigernødder; Andet
ko: 호환 미끼 유형: 보일리; 빵; 옥수수 알; 덤벨; 밑밥; 입자; 떡밥; 펠릿; 소프트 플라스틱 미끼; 타이거 넛츠; 기타
pt-BR: Tipo de isca compatível: Boilies; Pão; Grãos de milho; Dumbbells; Engodo; Partículas; Massa; Pellets; Isca de plástico macio; Tigernuts; Outro